Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5130.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4u. (1) Beginning July 7, 1999, the tax under this act does not apply to the storage, use, or consumption of investment coins and bullion. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Bullion" means gold, silver, or platinum in a bulk state, where its value depends on its content rather than its form, with a purity of not less than 900 parts per 1,000. Beginning January 1, 2026, bullion includes leaf, foil, or film of gold, silver, or platinum that has a metallic content of 50% or more, exclusive of any transparent polymer holder, coating, or encasement, and that is used as currency, but is not legal tender issued by the United States government or a foreign government. (b) "Investment coins" means numismatic coins or other forms of money and legal tender manufactured of gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or other metal and issued by the United States government or a foreign government with a fair market value greater than the face value of the coins. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5131 (request no. H03720'25). (b) House Bill No. 5129 (request no. H03721'25).